New York, session 2025-2026, S5019.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 259-j of the executive law, as 2 amended by section 38-g of subpart A of part C of chapter 62 of the laws 3 of 2011, is amended to read as follows: 4 1. [Except where a determinate sentence was imposed for a felony other 5 than a felony defined in article two hundred twenty or article two 6 hundred twenty-one of the penal law, if] If the board of parole is 7 satisfied that an absolute discharge from presumptive release, parole, 8 conditional release or release to a period of post-release supervision 9 is in the best interests of society, the board may grant such a 10 discharge prior to the expiration of the full term or maximum term to 11 any person who has been on unrevoked community supervision for at least 12 three consecutive years. A discharge granted under this section shall 13 constitute a termination of the sentence with respect to which it was 14 granted. No such discharge shall be granted unless the board is satis- 15 fied that the parolee or releasee, otherwise financially able to comply 16 with an order of restitution and the payment of any mandatory surcharge, 17 sex offender registration fee or DNA databank fee previously imposed by 18 a court of competent jurisdiction, has made a good faith effort to 19 comply therewith. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09721-01-5